lrec2010_examples/diminutive.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +N +Adj +mas +fem +dim +Sg +Pl +Super +int GUESS
LEXICON Root

Adjective ;

LEXICON Ainf

e+Adj+dim+fem+Sg:^ecita #;
e+Adj+dim+mas+Sg:^ecito #;
e+Adj+dim+fem+Pl:^ecitas #;
e+Adj+dim+mas+Pl:^ecitos #;
r+Adj+dim+fem+Sg:^rcita #;
r+Adj+dim+mas+Sg:^rcito #;
r+Adj+dim+fem+Pl:^rcitas #;
r+Adj+dim+mas+Pl:^rcitos #;
n+Adj+dim+fem+Sg:^ncita #;
n+Adj+dim+mas+Sg:^ncito #;
n+Adj+dim+fem+Pl:^ncitas #;
n+Adj+dim+mas+Pl:^ncitos #;

LEXICON Adjective
abonado Ainf;
absolutista Ainf;
absurdo Ainf;
acalorado Ainf;
aceitero Ainf;
aceptable Ainf;
ácimo Ainf;
aconsejable Ainf;
activo Ainf;
acusatorio Ainf;
adepto Ainf;
administrador Ainf;
adquisitivo Ainf;
adverbial Ainf;
aerostático Ainf;
afectuoso Ainf;
afirmativo Ainf;
agarrado Ainf;
agrario Ainf;
agropecuario Ainf;
aislacionista Ainf;
albanés Ainf;
alemán Ainf;
aliado Ainf;
alpino Ainf;
altivo Ainf;
amargo Ainf;
ambos Ainf;
amigo Ainf;
amplio Ainf;
anarquista Ainf;
andariego Ainf;
anglosajón Ainf;
anímico Ainf;
antagónico Ainf;
antibala Ainf;
antillano Ainf;
antisocial Ainf;
apañado Ainf;
apático Ainf;
aplicado Ainf;
aprensivo Ainf;
apurado Ainf;
arcaico Ainf;
ario Ainf;
armenio Ainf;
arreglado Ainf;
arrojado Ainf;
articular Ainf;
asaltante Ainf;
asfaltado Ainf;
asno Ainf;
astral Ainf;
atado Ainf;
aterrador Ainf;
atómico Ainf;
atroz Ainf;
auditivo Ainf;
australiano Ainf;
autodidáctico Ainf;
autopropulsado Ainf;
aventajado Ainf;
axiomático Ainf;
azufroso Ainf;
bactericida Ainf;
baldado Ainf;
bananero Ainf;
barcelonés Ainf;
bastardo Ainf;
bebedero Ainf;
bélgico Ainf;
bembudo Ainf;
benigno Ainf;
bezudo Ainf;
bienhechor Ainf;
bilingüe Ainf;
biográfico Ainf;
bisoño Ainf;
blanquecino Ainf;
bolo Ainf;
boquiabierto Ainf;
bosquimán Ainf;
brillante Ainf;
brutal Ainf;
burlesco Ainf;
caballeroso Ainf;
cachetudo Ainf;
cairota Ainf;
calentador Ainf;
calmoso Ainf;
calloso Ainf;
caminero Ainf;
campero Ainf;
canceroso Ainf;
canino Ainf;
cantarín Ainf;
capital Ainf;
característico Ainf;
carburante Ainf;
cardinal Ainf;
caribe Ainf;
caritativo Ainf;
carnívoro Ainf;
cascado Ainf;
castizo Ainf;
cateto Ainf;
causativo Ainf;
caviloso Ainf;
célebre Ainf;
censurable Ainf;
centrípeto Ainf;
cereal Ainf;
certificado Ainf;
cetrino Ainf;
cierto Ainf;
cínico Ainf;
cismático Ainf;
claro Ainf;
cobarde Ainf;
coherente Ainf;
colgante Ainf;
colorado Ainf;
comercial Ainf;
comodón Ainf;
competitivo Ainf;
comprensible Ainf;
común Ainf;
conceptual Ainf;
concurrido Ainf;
confidencial Ainf;
congoleño Ainf;
conmemorativo Ainf;
consciente Ainf;
consistente Ainf;
constructivo Ainf;
contadero Ainf;
contiguo Ainf;
contrahecho Ainf;
convaleciente Ainf;
convidado Ainf;
copetudo Ainf;
córneo Ainf;
correctivo Ainf;
corriente Ainf;
cosaco Ainf;
costumbrista Ainf;
creíble Ainf;
crítico Ainf;
cruel Ainf;
cuadrilátero Ainf;
cuartelero Ainf;
cuerdo Ainf;
culto Ainf;
cursi Ainf;
chaparro Ainf;
checoeslovaco Ainf;
chinche Ainf;
chispeante Ainf;
chul Ainf;
dable Ainf;
debido Ainf;
decimoctavo Ainf;
decimosexto Ainf;
decrépito Ainf;
definido Ainf;
delgado Ainf;
demacrado Ainf;
demoledor Ainf;
dentado Ainf;
derecho Ainf;
desagradecido Ainf;
desapasionado Ainf;
desastrado Ainf;
descampado Ainf;
descomedido Ainf;
descosido Ainf;
deseable Ainf;
desfachatado Ainf;
deshecho Ainf;
desleal Ainf;
desmirriado Ainf;
despectivo Ainf;
despreciable Ainf;
destartalado Ainf;
desventurado Ainf;
deudor Ainf;
dialéctico Ainf;
diestro Ainf;
digerible Ainf;
dinástico Ainf;
dirigente Ainf;
discrecional Ainf;
disoluto Ainf;
distante Ainf;
diversificado Ainf;
docto Ainf;
dominguero Ainf;
drástico Ainf;
dulce Ainf;
eclesial Ainf;
ecuestre Ainf;
efectivo Ainf;
egoísta Ainf;
electo Ainf;
electrotécnico Ainf;
eliminatorio Ainf;
embrionario Ainf;
emocionante Ainf;
enamorado Ainf;
encendido Ainf;
endeble Ainf;
enésimo Ainf;
engreído Ainf;
enrarecido Ainf;
enterado Ainf;
entusiástico Ainf;
equidistante Ainf;
erguido Ainf;
eruptivo Ainf;
escarpado Ainf;
esclerótico Ainf;
escueto Ainf;
esgrimista Ainf;
espantoso Ainf;
espectador Ainf;
esplendoroso Ainf;
esquemático Ainf;
estadounidense Ainf;
estentóreo Ainf;
estimado Ainf;
estrafalario Ainf;
estricto Ainf;
estupefaciente Ainf;
etíope Ainf;
euskera Ainf;
exagerado Ainf;
excesivo Ainf;
exhaustivo Ainf;
existencial Ainf;
expedicionario Ainf;
explotador Ainf;
extemporáneo Ainf;
extranjero Ainf;
extremado Ainf;
faccioso Ainf;
falaz Ainf;
famoso Ainf;
farmacéutico Ainf;
fatuo Ainf;
federal Ainf;
fenómeno Ainf;
fervoroso Ainf;
fidedigno Ainf;
filipino Ainf;
fingido Ainf;
flaco Ainf;
flojo Ainf;
fluvial Ainf;
foráneo Ainf;
forrajero Ainf;
fotosensible Ainf;
francófilo Ainf;
fraudulento Ainf;
frívolo Ainf;
frutero Ainf;
fullero Ainf;
funesto Ainf;
futuro Ainf;
galante Ainf;
ganancioso Ainf;
garrafal Ainf;
gauchesco Ainf;
genérico Ainf;
geológico Ainf;
gimnástico Ainf;
globular Ainf;
gordo Ainf;
graduado Ainf;
grandilocuo Ainf;
grato Ainf;
griego Ainf;
grueso Ainf;
gubernamental Ainf;
hábil Ainf;
hacendado Ainf;
harapiento Ainf;
hechicero Ainf;
heráldico Ainf;
herético Ainf;
híbrido Ainf;
hinchado Ainf;
hipotético Ainf;
hispanoárabe Ainf;
hombruno Ainf;
honesto Ainf;
hormiguero Ainf;
hospitalario Ainf;
huérfano Ainf;
humanitario Ainf;
hurón Ainf;
idéntico Ainf;
ignorante Ainf;
ilimitado Ainf;
ilustrísimo Ainf;
impávido Ainf;
imperceptible Ainf;
impertinente Ainf;
importante Ainf;
imprescindible Ainf;
impúdico Ainf;
inadvertido Ainf;
incalculable Ainf;
incierto Ainf;
incómodo Ainf;
inconmensurable Ainf;
incorrecto Ainf;
indebido Ainf;
indeliberado Ainf;
indicado Ainf;
indiscreto Ainf;
indocumentado Ainf;
inepto Ainf;
infatigable Ainf;
ínfimo Ainf;
infrahumano Ainf;
inhábil Ainf;
inmanente Ainf;
inmoral Ainf;
innecesario Ainf;
inoperante Ainf;
insalubre Ainf;
insignificante Ainf;
insolvente Ainf;
instantáneo Ainf;
insultante Ainf;
íntegro Ainf;
intenso Ainf;
intermitente Ainf;
íntimo Ainf;
intrigante Ainf;
inválido Ainf;
investigador Ainf;
invulnerable Ainf;
irreal Ainf;
irresoluto Ainf;
islandés Ainf;
izquierdista Ainf;
jocoso Ainf;
judaico Ainf;
jurado Ainf;
kurdo Ainf;
laborioso Ainf;
lácteo Ainf;
lampiño Ainf;
largo Ainf;
latino Ainf;
laxante Ainf;
legal Ainf;
lelo Ainf;
lerdo Ainf;
leve Ainf;
libertino Ainf;
ligero Ainf;
lince Ainf;
lisboense Ainf;
litoral Ainf;
locomotor Ainf;
longitudinal Ainf;
lugareño Ainf;
lustroso Ainf;
lloroso Ainf;
maderero Ainf;
mágico Ainf;
mahometano Ainf;
maleable Ainf;
maligno Ainf;
malsufrido Ainf;
manido Ainf;
manual Ainf;
marcador Ainf;
marital Ainf;
marxista Ainf;
materialista Ainf;
mauretano Ainf;
mayúsculo Ainf;
medianero Ainf;
mediterráneo Ainf;
melindroso Ainf;
mendaz Ainf;
mentado Ainf;
mercenario Ainf;
mesurado Ainf;
mexicano Ainf;
milagroso Ainf;
mímico Ainf;
minúsculo Ainf;
misericordioso Ainf;
mocho Ainf;
mohino Ainf;
molido Ainf;
monjil Ainf;
monumental Ainf;
mordaz Ainf;
mortífero Ainf;
motociclista Ainf;
mucho Ainf;
mujeriego Ainf;
múltiple Ainf;
murmurador Ainf;
mutilado Ainf;
nato Ainf;
nazista Ainf;
neoyorquino Ainf;
nítido Ainf;
nórdico Ainf;
novelístico Ainf;
ñoño Ainf;
observador Ainf;
oculto Ainf;
ojoso Ainf;
onceno Ainf;
opresivo Ainf;
ordinal Ainf;
ortográfico Ainf;
paciente Ainf;
palpitante Ainf;
paquistaní Ainf;
pardillo Ainf;
paso Ainf;
paterno Ainf;
patrocinador Ainf;
pecuniario Ainf;
pelma Ainf;
peor Ainf;
perifrástico Ainf;
perspicaz Ainf;
petulante Ainf;
pipudo Ainf;
plausible Ainf;
pobre Ainf;
polígamo Ainf;
pontifical Ainf;
poses Ainf;
practicante Ainf;
preescolar Ainf;
présbite Ainf;
pretencioso Ainf;
primitivo Ainf;
problemático Ainf;
progresista Ainf;
propenso Ainf;
providencial Ainf;
público Ainf;
puntero Ainf;
quedo Ainf;
quingentésimo Ainf;
radiactio Ainf;
raro Ainf;
realengo Ainf;
recitativo Ainf;
redivivo Ainf;
refrigerador Ainf;
reivindicativo Ainf;
rencilloso Ainf;
represivo Ainf;
resistente Ainf;
retorcido Ainf;
revoltoso Ainf;
rocoso Ainf;
rosa Ainf;
rupestre Ainf;
sagaz Ainf;
sangriento Ainf;
satisfactorio Ainf;
seglar Ainf;
semifinal Ainf;
sentimental Ainf;
sesentón Ainf;
silencioso Ainf;
sinónimo Ainf;
sobrante Ainf;
solapado Ainf;
somero Ainf;
sostenido Ainf;
subsiguiente Ainf;
sudoroso Ainf;
superado Ainf;
suroeste Ainf;
taciturno Ainf;
taurino Ainf;
televisivo Ainf;
tenso Ainf;
terrenal Ainf;
tímido Ainf;
tolerante Ainf;
torturador Ainf;
traicionero Ainf;
transportador Ainf;
trepador Ainf;
triple Ainf;
tunante Ainf;
último Ainf;
unitario Ainf;
utópico Ainf;
valioso Ainf;
vascuence Ainf;
vendedor Ainf;
veraz Ainf;
vertical Ainf;
vigente Ainf;
viscoso Ainf;
vivo Ainf;
voluntario Ainf;
yugoeslavo Ainf;
zorro Ainf;
